North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 3B. State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
§ 135-48.20.
Board of Trustees established.

There is established the Board of Trustees of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.

The Board of Trustees of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees shall consist of 10 members.

The State Treasurer shall be an ex officio member of the Board and shall serve as its Chair, but shall only vote in order to break a tie vote.

The Director of the Office of State Budget and Management shall be an ex officio nonvoting member of the Board.

Two members shall be appointed by the Governor. Terms shall be for two years. Vacancies shall be filled by the Governor.

Two members shall be appointed by the State Treasurer. Terms shall be for two years. Vacancies shall be filled by the State Treasurer.

Two members shall be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

. Terms shall be for two years. Vacancies shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

.

Two members shall be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

. Terms shall be for two years. Vacancies shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

.

In making appointments, the appointing authorities shall ensure that one of the appointees under subsection (e) of this section, one of the appointees under subsection (f) of this section, and one of the appointees under subsection (g) of this section,
and one of the appointees under subsection (h) of this section are one of the following:

An employee of a State department, agency, or institution;

A teacher employed by a North Carolina public school system;

A retired employee of a State department, agency, or institution; or

A retired teacher from a North Carolina public school system.In making appointments to the Board under this section, each appointing authority shall consult with all other appointing authorities prior to making its own appointments to ensure that the
Board includes members of each of the groups listed in subdivisions (1) through (4) of this subsection.

In making appointments, the appointing authorities shall appoint individuals from the following categories:

Individuals with expertise in actuarial science or health economics.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-84, s. 9, effective June 25, 2018.

Individuals with expertise in health benefits and administration.

Individuals with expertise in health law and policy.

Physicians who are licensed to practice medicine in this State.In making appointments to the Board under this section, each appointing authority shall consult with all other appointing authorities prior to making its own appointments to ensure that each
of the areas of expertise listed in subdivisions (1) through (5) of this subsection is represented by at least one member of the Board.

Each appointing authority may remove any member appointed by that appointing authority.

The members of the Board of Trustees shall receive one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day, except employees eligible to enroll in the Plan, whenever the full Board of Trustees holds a public session, and travel allowances under

G.S. 138-6

when traveling to and from meetings of the Board of Trustees or hearings under

G.S. 135-48.24

, but shall not receive any subsistence allowance or per diem under

G.S. 138-5

, except when holding a meeting or hearing where this section does not provide for payment of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per day.

No member of the Board of Trustees may serve more than three consecutive two-year terms.

Immunity. — Except to the extent provided under Article 31A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and to the extent of insurance coverage purchased pursuant to

G.S. 58-32-15

, a person serving on the Board of Trustees shall be immune individually from civil liability for monetary damages for any act, or failure to act, arising out of that service, except where any of the following apply:

The person was not acting within the scope of that person’s official duties.

The person was not acting in good faith.

The person committed gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct that resulted in damages or injury.

The person derived an improper personal financial benefit, either directly or indirectly, from the transaction.

The person incurred the liability from the operation of a motor vehicle.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 922, s. 1; 1985, c. 732, ss. 2-5, 8, 11, 42, 59, 60; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 1; 1987, c. 857, s. 2; 1995, c. 490, s. 56; 2002-126, s. 28.16(a); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(b);
2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (e); 2011-85, ss. 2.5(a), 2.10; 2011-96, s. 6(a); 2017-135, s. 4; 2018-84, s. 9.

§ 135-48.21.
Board officers, quorum, meetings.

Besides the Chair, the Board of Trustees shall elect from its own membership such officers as it sees fit.

A majority of the voting members of the Board of Trustees in office shall constitute a quorum. Decisions of the Board of Trustees shall be made by a majority vote of the Trustees present, except as otherwise provided in this Article.

The Board shall meet at least quarterly. Meetings may also be called by the Chair, or at the written request of three members.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1987, c. 857, s. 3; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (f); 2009-16, s. 5(c); 2011-85, ss. 2.5(b), 2.10.

§ 135-48.22.
Board powers and duties.

The Board of Trustees shall have the following powers and duties:

Approve benefit programs, as provided in G.S. 135-48.30(a)(2).

Approve premium rates, co-pays, deductibles, and coinsurance percentages and maximums for the Plan, as provided in G.S. 135-48.30(a)(2).

(2a)
Approve the benefit program, premium rates, co-pays, deductibles, and coinsurance percentages and maximums for the coverage offered under G.S. 135-48.40(e).

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-125, s. 3(b), effective August 30, 2021.

Approve large contracts, as provided in G.S. 135-48.33(a).

Consult with and advise the State Treasurer as required by this Article and as requested by the State Treasurer.

Develop and maintain a strategic plan for the Plan.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10; 2012-173, s. 4(a); 2014-100, s. 35.16(b); 2021-125, s. 3(b).

Premium Adjustments.

For premiums for partially contributory coverage and contributory coverage, see Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.2(a) and (b), and related provisions, noted under

G.S. 135-48.40

.

For adjustments to deductibles, coinsurance maximums, and co-payments under the Basic and Standard PPO Plans, see Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.3(a), and related provisions, noted under

G.S. 135-48.30

.

§ 135-48.23.
Executive Administrator.

The Plan shall have an Executive Administrator. The Executive Administrator position is exempt from the provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes as provided in

G.S. 126-5(c1)

.

The Executive Administrator shall be appointed by the State Treasurer. The term of employment and salary of the Executive Administrator shall be set by the State Treasurer.

The Executive Administrator may be removed from office by the State Treasurer, and any vacancy in the office of Executive Administrator may be filled by the State Treasurer.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-84, s. 8(a), effective June 25, 2018.

(c1) The State Treasurer may employ such clerical and professional staff, and such other assistance as may be necessary to assist the Executive Administrator, the Board of Trustees, and the State Treasurer in carrying out their duties and responsibilities
under this Article. The State Treasurer may designate any managerial, professional, or policy-making positions as exempt from the North Carolina Human Resources Act. All exempt employees shall serve at the pleasure of the State
Treasurer, and any vacancies in these positions may be filled by the State Treasurer. Salaries of exempt employees shall be set by the State Treasurer.

(c2) The Executive Administrator may also negotiate, renegotiate and execute contracts with third parties in the performance of the Executive Administrator’s duties and responsibilities under this Article; provided any contract negotiations, renegotiations
and execution with a Claims Processor, with an optional alternative comprehensive health benefit plan, or program thereunder, authorized under

G.S. 135-48.2

, with a preferred provider of institutional or professional hospital and medical care, or with a pharmacy benefit manager shall be done only with the consent of the State Treasurer.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-85, s. 6, effective June 25, 2018.

History.
1985, c. 732, s. 10; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 1987, c. 857, s. 5; 1991, c. 427, s. 2; 2000-141, s. 2; 2001-446, s. 6; 2004-124, s. 31.27(a); 2005-276, ss. 29.33(c), 29.34(a); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(l); 2008-168,
ss. 1(a), 2(a), (h), 2.2; 2011-85, ss. 2.1(a), 2.5(c), 2.10; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2017-57, s. 35.22; 2018-84, s. 8(a); 2018-85, s. 6.

§ 135-48.24.
Administrative review.

If, after exhaustion of internal appeal handling outlined in the contract with the Claims Processor, any person is aggrieved, then the Claims Processor shall bring the matter to the attention of the Executive Administrator. The Executive Administrator
shall promptly decide whether the subject matter of the internal appeal is a determination subject to external review under Part 4 of Article 50 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes. The following shall apply to decisions made
under this subsection:

The Executive Administrator shall inform the aggrieved person and the aggrieved person’s provider of the decision and shall provide the aggrieved person notice of the aggrieved person’s right to appeal that decision as provided in this subsection.

If the Executive Administrator decides that the subject matter raised on internal appeal is not a determination subject to external review, then the Executive Administrator shall have the authority to make a binding decision on the matter.

If the Executive Administrator decides that the subject matter raised on internal appeal is a determination subject to external review, as provided for under subsection (b) of this section, then that decision may be contested by the aggrieved person under
Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The person contesting the decision may proceed with external review pending a decision in the contested case under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The State Treasurer, in consultation with the Board of Trustees, shall adopt and implement utilization review and internal grievance procedures that are substantially equivalent to those required under

G.S. 58-50-61

and

G.S. 58-50-62

. External review of determinations shall be conducted in accordance with Part 4 of Article 50 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes. As used in this section, “determination” is a decision by the State Treasurer,
or the Plan’s designated utilization review organization administrated by or under contract with the Plan that an admission, availability of care, continued stay, or other health care service has been reviewed and, based upon information
provided, does not meet the Plan’s benefit offerings, or requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care, or effectiveness, and the requested service is therefore denied, reduced, or terminated.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 49, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to contested cases commenced on or after that date.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, s. 53; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 20; 1991, c. 427, s. 6; 2001-446, s. 5(e); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (n); 2011-85, ss. 2.5(g), 2.10; 2011-398, s. 49; 2021-125,
s. 3(a).

§ 135-48.25.
Rules.

The State Treasurer, in consultation with the Board of Trustees, may adopt rules to implement this Article. The State Treasurer shall provide to all employing units, all health benefit representatives, all relevant health care providers affected by a
rule, and to any other persons requesting a written description and approved by the State Treasurer written notice and an opportunity to comment not later than 30 days prior to adopting, amending, or rescinding a rule, unless immediate
adoption of the rule without notice is necessary in order to fully effectuate the purpose of the rule. Rules of the Board of Trustees shall remain in effect until amended or repealed by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
provide a written description of the rules adopted under this section to all employing units, all health benefit representatives, all relevant health care providers affected by a rule, and to any other persons requesting a written
description and approved by the State Treasurer on a timely basis. Rules adopted by the State Treasurer to implement this Article are not subject to Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, s. 54; 1991, c. 427, s. 7; 1997-278, s. 3; 1997-468, s. 5; 1998-1, s. 4(f); 2001-253, s. 1(r); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 2(a), (o); 2011-85, ss. 2.5(h), 2.10.

§ 135-48.26.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.27.
Reports to the General Assembly; General Assembly access to information.

The State Treasurer, the Executive Administrator, and Board of Trustees shall report to the General Assembly as requested, and in the manner designated, by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Employees
of the Legislative Services Commission designated by the Legislative Services Officer (i) shall have access to all records related to the Plan of the State Treasurer, the Board of Trustees, the Executive Administrator, the Claims Processor,
and the Plan and (ii) shall be entitled to attend all meetings, including executive sessions, of the Board of Trustees.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1985, c. 732, ss. 55, 55.1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, s. 7; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), (c), 2(c); 2011-85, ss. 2.4(d), 2.10; 2012-194, s. 30; 2021-125, s. 4.

§ 135-48.28.
Auditing of the Plan.

The State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees and the Claims Processor shall be subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

History.
1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1398, s. 6; 1983, c. 913, s. 24; 1985, c. 732, s. 46; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1020, p. 20; 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), (c), 2(g); 2011-85, ss. 2.4(c), 2.10.

§ 135-48.29.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 3. Plan Operation.

§ 135-48.30.
Powers and duties of the State Treasurer.

The State Treasurer shall have the following powers and duties:

Administer and operate the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees in accordance with

G.S. 135-48.2

and the provisions of this Article.

Set benefits, premium rates, co-pays, deductibles, and coinsurance percentages and maximums, subject to approval by the Board of Trustees. In setting premium rates, the State Treasurer may set a partially contributory rate of zero dollars, subject to
approval by the Board of Trustees.

Set the allowable charges for medical and prescription drug benefits, as necessary.

Design and implement coordination of benefits policies.

May offer wellness incentives.

Set administrative and medical policies that are not in direct conflict with this Article.

Adopt and implement, in consultation with the Board of Trustees, utilization review and internal grievance procedures that are substantially equivalent to those required under

G.S. 58-50-61

and

G.S. 58-50-62

. External review of determinations shall be conducted in accordance with Part 4 of Article 50 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

Implement and administer pharmacy and medical utilization management programs and programs to detect and address utilization abuse of benefits.

Establish and operate fraud detection and audit programs.

Expend funds for any independent audit.

Establish procedures to require prior medical approval and implement the procedures after consultation with the Board of Trustees.

Prepare and submit to the Governor and the General Assembly cost estimates for the Plan, including those required by Article 15 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes.

Disclose to the Governor and the General Assembly changes or additions to the health benefits programs and health care cost containment programs offered under the Plan, together with statements of financial and actuarial effects as required by Article
15 of Chapter 120 of the General Statutes.

Secure and maintain tax qualification of the Plan under any applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

, (16) Repealed by Session Laws 2012-173, s. 3(c), effective January 1, 2013.

(17) Optionally offer Medicare-related options under

G.S. 135-48.38

.

(18) In accordance with

G.S. 135-48.39

and subject to approval by the Board of Trustees, issue an order declaring an option of deferring premium or debt payments when there is a state of disaster or emergency.

The State Treasurer may delegate his or her powers and duties under this section to the Executive Administrator, the Board of Trustees, and employees of the Plan. In delegating powers or duties, however, the State Treasurer maintains the responsibility
for the performance of those powers or duties.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10; 2012-173, s. 3(c), 4(b); 2020-3, s. 4.21(a).

Deductible, Coinsurance, and Co-payment Adjustments.

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.3(a), provides: “Effective July 1, 2011, the Executive Administrator shall make the following changes to deductibles, coinsurance maximums, and co-payments under the Basic and Standard PPO Plans:

“(1) Basic Plan (70/30):

“a. Increase the in-network annual deductible to nine hundred thirty-three dollars ($933.00) for member-only coverage and to one thousand eight hundred sixty-six dollars ($1,866) for the out-of-network annual deductible for member-only coverage. The aggregate
maximum annual deductible for employee-child and employee-family coverage shall be three times the member-only annual deductibles.

“b. Increase the in-network coinsurance maximum to three thousand seven hundred ninety-three dollars ($3,793) for member-only coverage and to seven thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars ($7,586) for member-only out-of-network maximum coinsurance. The
aggregate maximum coinsurance for employee-child and employee-family coverage shall be three times the member-only coinsurance maximums.

“c. Increase the in-network urgent care co-payment to eighty-seven dollars ($87.00) per covered individual.

“d. Increase the in-network primary care co-payment to thirty-five dollars ($35.00) per covered individual.

“e. Increase the in-network specialist co-payment to eighty-one dollars ($81.00) per covered individual, except that for mental health and substance abuse services, chiropractic services, and physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech therapy
services, the in-network specialist co-payment shall be sixty-four dollars ($64.00) per covered individual.

“f. Increase the in-network and out-of-network inpatient co-payment to two hundred ninety-one dollars ($291.00) per covered individual.

“g. Increase the in-network and out-of-network emergency room co-payment to two hundred ninety-one dollars ($291.00) per covered individual.

“h. Increase prescription drug co-payments as required under G.S. 135-45.6(b)(1) as amended by this section.

“i. Except as otherwise provided in this act, co-payments and coinsurance for coverage not otherwise listed in this subdivision shall remain as applicable in the 2010-2011 benefit year.

“(2) Standard Plan (80/20):

“a. Increase the in-network annual deductible to seven hundred dollars ($700.00) for member-only coverage and to one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) for the member-only out-of-network annual deductible. The aggregate maximum annual deductible for
employee-child and employee-family coverage shall be three times the member-only annual deductibles.

“b. Increase the in-network coinsurance maximum to three thousand two hundred ten dollars ($3,210) for member-only coverage and to six thousand four hundred twenty dollars ($6,420) for member-only out-of-network maximum coinsurance. The aggregate maximum
coinsurance for employee-child and employee-family coverage shall be three times the member-only coinsurance maximums.

“c. Increase the in-network urgent care co-payment to eighty-seven dollars ($87.00) per covered individual.

“d. Increase the in-network primary care co-payment to thirty dollars ($30.00) per covered individual.

“e. Increase the in-network specialist co-payment to seventy dollars ($70.00) per covered individual, except that for mental health and substance abuse services, chiropractic services, and physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech therapy services,
the in-network specialist co-payment shall be fifty-two dollars ($52.00) per covered individual.

“f. Increase the in-network and out-of-network inpatient co-payment to two hundred thirty-three dollars ($233.00) per covered individual.

“g. Increase the in-network and out-of-network emergency room co-payment to two hundred thirty-three dollars ($233.00) per covered individual.

“h. Increase prescription drug co-pays as required under G.S. 135-45.6(b)(1) as amended by this act.

“i. Except as otherwise provided in this act, co-payments and coinsurance for coverage not otherwise listed in this subdivision shall remain as applicable in the 2010-2011 benefit year.”

Session Laws 2011-85, s. 2.11(b), effective January 1, 2012, provides:

“Sections 1.2 and 1.3(a) of this act are repealed.”

Session Laws 2011-96, s. 2(e), provides: “Credits toward deductibles and coinsurance maximums that Plan members earn for services incurred during the months of July and August of 2011 shall be carried forward and applied toward meeting the new deductibles
and coinsurance maximums for the period beginning September 1, 2011. If a Plan member fully meets his or her deductible or coinsurance maximum during the months of July and August of 2011, then that Plan member shall receive credit
for the amount of the deductible or coinsurance maximum that the Plan member met during that time, but shall then be subject to meeting any additional amounts required by the new deductible and coinsurance maximums effective September
1, 2011.”

For premium rates for partially contributory coverage and premium adjustments for contributory coverage, see Session Laws 2011-85, s. 1.2(a) and (b), and related provisions, noted under

G.S. 135-48.40

.

§ 135-48.31.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.32.
Contracts to provide benefits.

The Plan benefits shall be provided under contracts between the Plan and the claims processors selected by the Plan. The contracts necessarily will conform to applicable State law.

Unless otherwise directed by the Plan, each Claims Processor shall provide the Plan with a Claims Data Feed, which includes all Claim Payment Data, at a frequency agreed to by the Plan and the Claims Processor. The frequency shall be no less than monthly.
The Claims Processor is not required to disclose Claim Payment Data that reflects rates negotiated with or agreed to by a noncontracted third party but, upon request, shall provide to the Plan sufficient documentation to support
the payment of claims for which Claim Payment Data is withheld on such basis.

Any provision of any contract between a Claims Processor and a health care provider, subcontractor, or third party that would prevent or prohibit the Claims Processor from disclosing Claim Payment Data to the Plan, in accordance with this section, shall
be void and unenforceable, but only to the extent the provision prevents and prohibits disclosure to the Plan.

The Plan may use and disclose Claim Payment Data solely for the purpose of administering and operating the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees in accordance with

G.S. 135-48.2

and the provisions of this Article. The Plan shall not make any use or disclosure of Claim Payment Data that would compromise the proprietary nature of the data or, as applicable, its status as a trade secret, or
otherwise misappropriate the data.

The Plan may not use a provider’s Claim Payment Data to negotiate rates, fee schedules, or other master charges with that provider or any other provider.

The Plan may disclose Claim Payment Data to a third party to use on the Plan’s behalf as agreed upon between the Plan and the Claims Processor. The Plan must obtain the agreement of the Claims Processor for each third party to whom the Plan seeks to disclose
Claim Payment Data and for each use the third party will make of the data. The Plan may not disclose Claim Payment Data to any third party without first entering into a contract with the third party that contains restrictions on
the use and disclosure of the Claim Payment Data by the third party that are at least as restrictive as the provisions of this section.

A Claims Processor who discloses Claim Payment Data in accordance with this section shall not incur any civil liability and shall not be subject to equitable relief in connection for the disclosure.

History.
2008-168, s. 3(c); 2009-16, ss. 2(f), 5(h); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-313, s. 2; 2010-194, s. 18(b); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(a), 2.10; 2016-104, s. 3.

2009 Health Benefit Changes.

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 2(a), provides: “Eliminate PPO Plus Option. — Effective July 1, 2009, the PPO Plus option (90/10 in-network coverage) under the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees (‘Plan’) is eliminated. The Executive Administrator
shall provide notice to all members of the Plan that this option will no longer be available as of July 1, 2009. Employees enrolled in the Plan’s Plus option shall have the choice of enrolling in the Basic or Standard Plan options
for the 2009-2010 benefit year.”

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 2(h), provides: “Pharmacy Benefit Savings. — The Plan shall direct its pharmacy benefit manager (PBM), within the terms of the Plan’s PBM contract, to achieve the sum of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) in savings in pharmacy
benefit costs in the 2009-2010 fiscal year, and the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in savings in pharmacy benefit costs in the 2010-2011 fiscal year through reduced reimbursements paid to pharmacies for prescription drugs.
If the savings achieved in each six-month period of the fiscal year do not exceed one hundred five percent (105%) of the savings amount specified in this section for that fiscal year, there shall be no further adjustment to reimbursements
paid to pharmacies for that six-month period. If the total savings achieved, by fiscal year, exceeds one hundred five percent (105%) of the specified savings amount in each six-month period of the fiscal year, the Plan shall adjust
pharmacy reimbursement reductions accordingly. The Plan shall review savings achieved twice annually to ensure compliance with this section. The Plan shall calculate the savings to be achieved based on Plan enrollment and estimated
cost and utilization trends incorporated in the Plan’s Financial Projections as of March 20, 2009. The total savings by fiscal year achieved in this section may be increased or decreased without adjustment based on a change in total
enrollment provided that the rate of savings achieved on a per-member per-month basis remains constant. Not later than 60 days immediately following each six-month period, the Plan shall report the amount of savings achieved and any
adjustments made for that period to the Committee on Employee Hospital and Medical Benefits.”

Session Laws 2009-16, s. 7(a)-(f), as amended by Session Laws 2009-571, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws 2011-266, s. 1.33(a), provides: “(a) State Health Plan Blue Ribbon Task Force. — There is established the Blue Ribbon Task Force on the State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees (Task Force). The purpose of the Task Force is to review the governance of the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees (Plan) and to make recommendations for changes that will ensure
the ongoing financial stability of the Plan, increase and maintain high participation rates for dependent coverage under the Plan, study and compare coverage and costs of the Plan to coverage and costs of other State health plans in
the region, and address issues of cost, quality, and access to health care coverage under the Plan. In conducting its review of the Plan the Task Force shall consider all of the following:

“(1) The feasibility of transferring the ongoing day-to-day oversight of the Plan to an independent board or to a State agency.

“(2) Tiered premium rates for member-only coverage for employees and future retirees based on income or ability to pay.

“(3) Ways to increase participation in dependent coverage including supplements from the State or other methods for reducing dependent premiums.

“(4) The benefits of implementing a closed prescription drug formulary.

“(5) Whether it is advisable to move the Plan to a calendar year, the costs involved in the move, and the benefits that accrue to the Plan and the members as a result of moving to a calendar year.

“(6) Any other matters the Task Force considers relevant to its purpose.

“(b) The Task Force shall consist of 15 members, appointed as follows:

“(1) Six members by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, three of whom shall be members of the House of Representatives, one shall be a public schoolteacher, one shall be a State or covered local government retiree other than a retired public
schoolteacher, and one at-large. Of the three legislators appointed to the Task Force, one shall be a member of the minority party.

“(2) Six members by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, three of whom shall be members of the Senate, one shall be a State employee who is not a public schoolteacher, one shall be a retired State public school employee, and one at-large. Of the three
legislators appointed to the Task Force, one shall be a member of the minority party.

“(3) One member by the Governor with expertise in the business of health insurance or in administering health care services other than an insurance company or third-party administrator or contractor of the Plan.

“(4) The chair of the Board of Trustees of the State Health Plan or the chair’s designee.

“(5) The Commissioner of Insurance or the Commissioner’s designee.

“(c) The cochairs of the Task Force shall convene the first meeting as soon as possible after appointments have been made. The Task Force may engage the services of a consultant to provide independent analysis of Plan costs and recommendations on how
to strengthen the Plan’s financial stability, benefit structure and coverage, and the most effective and efficient location for Plan administration.

“(d) The Task force shall terminate on or before July 1, 2011.

“(e) A majority of the Task Force members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall each appoint one Task Force member as chair. Appointments
shall be made as soon as possible after this act becomes law. Task Force members shall receive no compensation for their service but shall be paid per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses in accordance with

G.S. 120-3.1

,

G.S. 138-5

, and

G.S. 138-6

, as applicable.

“(f) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-266, 1.33(a), effective July 1, 2011.”

§ 135-48.33.
Contracting provisions; large contract review by Board of Trustees and Attorney General, auditing, no cost plus contracts.

The Board of Trustees must approve all Plan contracts in excess of three million dollars ($3,000,000), including contracts with an initial cost of less than three million dollars ($3,000,000), but that may exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) during
the term of the contract.

The Plan shall: (i) submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this Article to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee
for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all proposed contracts to be awarded by the Plan under this section a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Plan may audit the records of the contractor
during and after the term of the contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Plan shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose.

History.
2008-168, s. 3(c); 2009-16, ss. 2(f), 5(h); 2009-281, s. 1; 2009-313, s. 2; 2010-194, s. 18(b); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(a), 2.10; 2011-326, s. 15(s); 2021-125, s. 1.

§ 135-48.34.
Contracts not subject to Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes.

The design, adoption, and implementation of the preferred provider contracts, networks, and optional alternative comprehensive health benefit plans, and programs available under the optional alternative plans, as authorized under

G.S. 135-48.2

, are not subject to the requirements of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, but are subject to the requirements of

G.S. 135-48.33

.

History.
2011-85, s. 2.10.

§ 135-48.35.
Contract disputes not contested case under the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

A dispute involving the performance, terms, or conditions of a contract between the Plan and an entity under contract with the Plan is not a contested case under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
2001-192, s. 2; 2008-168, ss. 1(a), (c), 2(d); 2011-85, s. 2.4(e).

§ 135-48.36.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 135-48.37.
Liability of third person; right of subrogation; right of first recovery.

The Plan shall have the right of subrogation upon all of the Plan member’s right to recover from a liable third party for payment made under the Plan, for all medical expenses, including provider, hospital, surgical, or prescription drug expenses, to
the extent those payments are related to an injury caused by a liable third party. The Plan member shall do nothing to prejudice these rights. The Plan has the right to first recovery on any amounts so recovered, whether by the
Plan or the Plan member, and whether recovered by litigation, arbitration, mediation, settlement, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the recovery limitation set forth in

G.S. 28A-18-2

shall not apply to the Plan’s right of subrogation of Plan members.

If the Plan is precluded from exercising its right of subrogation, it may exercise its rights of recovery against any third party who was overpaid. If the Plan recovers damages from a liable third party in excess of the claims paid, any excess will be
paid to the member, less a proportionate share of the costs of collection.

In the event a Plan member recovers any amounts from a liable third party to which the Plan is entitled under this section, the Plan may recover the amounts directly from the Plan member. If, prior to the Plan exercising its rights under this section,
a Plan member utilizes or otherwise disposes of any amounts that were recovered from a liable third party to which the Plan is entitled under this section, then the Plan may pursue alternative judicial remedies against the Plan
member to recover the amount to which the Plan is entitled, including the pursuit of a judgment and lien against real property.

(c1)
The Plan has a lien, for not more than the value of claims paid related to the liability of the third party, on any damages subsequently recovered by a Plan member against any liable third party. If the Plan member
fails to pursue the remedy against a liable third party, the Plan is subrogated to the rights of the Plan member and is entitled to enforce liability in the Plan’s own name or in the name of the Plan member for the amount paid
by the Plan.

In no event shall the Plan’s lien exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total damages recovered by the Plan member, exclusive of the Plan member’s reasonable costs of collection as determined by the Plan in the Plan’s sole discretion. The decision by the
Plan as to the reasonable cost of collection is conclusive and is not a “final agency decision” for purposes of a contested case under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Notice of the Plan’s lien or right to recovery shall be
presumed when a Plan member is represented by an attorney, and the attorney shall disburse proceeds pursuant to this section.

The priority of any lien held by the State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees shall be superior to all nongovernmental liens and rights, whether such liens and rights are prior or subsequent to the lien.

History.
2004-124, s. 31.25; 2006-264, s. 66(a); 2008-168, ss. 1(a), 3(a), (t); 2011-85, ss. 2.6(j), 2.10; 2018-52, ss. 3, 5(a).

§ 135-48.37A.
Employing unit cooperation in collection of amounts owed to Plan.

Any payment of benefits or other amount to, or premiums or claims paid on behalf of, any Plan member that is later determined to be an overpayment, an erroneous payment, or a benefit or amount for which the Plan member was ineligible shall be repaid by
the Plan member to the Plan. If the Plan member is an employee of an employing unit, then any amounts to be recouped under this subsection shall be offset against the net wages of the Plan member.

If a Plan member owes an amount to the Plan under this section, has been notified of this amount owed by the Plan member in writing, and has not entered into a payment plan acceptable to the Plan within 30 days after the written notice, then the Plan
shall notify the Plan member’s employer of the amount owed. Upon receipt of this notice from the Plan, an employing unit shall offset the amount owed against not less than ten percent (10%) of the net wages of the Plan member until
the Plan notifies the employing unit that the amount owed has been paid in full. The Plan’s notice to the employing unit shall be prima facie evidence that the amount owed is valid and, notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, the employing unit has no obligation to verify the amount owed. The employing unit shall provide no more than 30 days’ but not less than 14 days’ written notice to the Plan member prior to beginning the offset.
The employing unit shall remit all amounts offset under this subsection to the Plan in intervals corresponding with the employing unit’s regular pay periods.

If an employing unit fails to adhere to the provisions of this section, the Plan shall, after notice to the employing unit of its failure to cooperate, be entitled to seek recovery of any amounts due directly from the employing unit.

No amount due under this section may be forgiven by the Board, the Plan, the Executive Administrator, the State Treasurer, or an employing unit. The Plan and the employing unit shall have a duty to pursue the repayment in full of these funds by all lawful
means available, including the filing of a civil action in the General Court of Justice.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the Plan’s ability to pursue alternative judicial remedies against a Plan member or a former Plan member, including the pursuit of a judgment and lien against real property.

History.
2018-52, s. 2(a).